California statutes. Water Code
(a) Provide for the deposit of any available and necessary moneys into the fund.

(b) Enter into agreements with local agencies that provide water or recycled water service to provide loans for the purposes described in subdivision (b) of Section 81000.

(c) Provide for appropriate audit, accounting, and fiscal management services, plans, and reports relative to the fund.

(d) Take additional incidental action as appropriate for the adequate administration and operation of the fund.

(e) Make requests on behalf of the state for deposit into the fund of available federal moneys.

(f) Enter into agreements with the federal government for federal contributions to the fund.

(g) Accept federal contributions to the fund.

(h) Provide technical assistance to local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81026.

(a) The department may enter into an agreement with the federal government for federal contributions to the fund only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The state identifies any required matching funds.

(2) The department is prepared to commit to the expenditure of any minimum amount in the fund in the manner required by the federal government.

(b) Any agreement between the department and the federal government shall contain those provisions, terms, and conditions required by the federal government and any implementing federal rules, regulations, guidelines, and policies, including, but not limited
 to, agreement to expend moneys in the fund in an expeditious and timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81030.

Moneys in the fund shall be used for the following purposes:

(a) Loans to local agencies that meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Are made at or below market interest rates.

(2) Require annual payments of principal and any interest, with repayment commencing not later than one year after loan funding and full amortization not later than 20 years after loan funding. Full amortization for loans to disadvantaged communities shall be not later than 25 years after loan funding.

(3) Require the loan recipient to establish an acceptable dedicated source of revenue for
 repayment of a loan.

(b) To guarantee, or purchase insurance for, local obligations if that action would improve credit market access or reduce interest rates.

(c) As a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the state, if the proceeds of the sale of those bonds will be deposited in the fund.

(d) To earn interest.

(e) Technical assistance.

(f) For payment of the department’s reasonable costs of administering the fund, not to exceed 4 percent of the fund.

(g) Grants, principal forgiveness, negative interest rates, and any other type of, or
 variation on, the types of assistance described in this section that is authorized by a federal capitalization grant deposited in the fund to the extent authorized and funded by that federal capitalization grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81033.

Funds made available pursuant to this division to a local agency shall not be used for that local agency’s administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81035.

Any repayment of fund moneys, including interest payments, and all interest earned on, or accruing to, any moneys in the fund, shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for expenditure for the purposes and uses authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. Implementation [81040. - 81046.]

81040.

Projects shall have one or more of the following benefits:

(a) Measurably reduce urban per capita potable water use.

(b) Measurably reduce agricultural water use.

(c) Increase the use or availability of recycled water supply.

(d) Reduce greenhouse gas emission and water and energy use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81042.

Subject to all applicable constitutional restrictions, a local agency may borrow money and incur indebtedness pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81044.

The department may adopt rules and guidelines necessary or convenient to implement this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81046.

A local agency may implement water use efficiency loan programs pursuant to this division through on-bill financing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 2, Sec. 10.   (AB 92)   Effective March 27, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 31. BAY AREA WATER SUPPLY AND CONSERVATION AGENCY [81300. - 81461.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [81300. - 81309.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [81300. - 81301.]

81300.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Bay Area Water Supply and Conservation Agency Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81301.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Many separate cities, districts, and public utilities are responsible for distribution of water in portions of the Bay Area served by the regional system operated by the City and County of San Francisco. Residents in the Counties of Alameda, San Mateo, and Santa Clara who depend on the water made available on a wholesale basis by the regional system have no right to vote in elections in the City and County of San Francisco and are not represented on the San Francisco commission that oversees operation of the regional system.

(b) The San Francisco regional system is vulnerable to catastrophic damage in a severe earthquake, which could result in San Francisco and neighboring communities being without potable water for up to 60 days. The San Francisco regional system is also susceptible to severe water shortages during periods of below average precipitation because of insufficient storage and the absence of contractual arrangements for alternative dry year supplies.

(c) The lack of a local, intergovernmental, cooperative governance structure for the San Francisco regional system prevents a systematic, rational, cost-effective program of water supply, water conservation, and recycling from being developed, funded, and implemented.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable local governments responsible for water distribution in the three counties to establish a multicounty agency authorized to plan for and acquire supplemental water supplies, to encourage water conservation and use of recycled water on a regional basis, and to assist in the financing of essential repairs and improvements to the San Francisco regional water system, including seismic strengthening.

(e) The need for coordinated planning and implementation of strategies for water supply, water conservation, water recycling, and repair and improvement of the San Francisco regional system may appropriately lead to the establishment of the Bay Area Water Planning and Conservation Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [81302. - 81309.]

81302.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81303.

“Agency” means the Bay Area Water Supply and Conservation Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81304.

“Board” means the board of directors of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81305.

“Eligible public entities” means the 24 public entities in San Mateo County, Alameda County, and Santa Clara County that purchase water from San Francisco pursuant to the July 2009 Water Supply Agreement, or any subsequent water supply contract, that include Alameda County Water District, City of Brisbane, City of Burlingame, Coastside County Water District, City of Daly City, City of East Palo Alto, Estero Municipal Improvement District, Guadalupe Valley Municipal Improvement District, City of Hayward, Town of Hillsborough, City of Menlo Park, Mid-Peninsula Water District, City of Millbrae, City of Milpitas, City of Mountain View, North Coast County Water District, City of Palo Alto, Purissima Hills Water District, City of Redwood City, City of San Bruno, City of San
 Jose, City of Santa Clara, City of Sunnyvale, and Westborough Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81306.

“Project” means a work and all of the activities related to, or necessary for, the acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of a work, including, but not limited to, planning, design, financing, contracting, project management, and administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81307.

“Regional water system” means facilities for the storage, treatment, and transmission of water operated by San Francisco located in the Counties of Tuolumne, Stanislaus, San Joaquin, Alameda, Santa Clara, San Mateo, and three terminal reservoirs in San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81307.5.

“San Francisco” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81308.

“Work” or “works” include, but is not limited to, reservoirs, water treatment plants, facilities for the transmission of water, water conservation measures and programs, facilities for the conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater, and facilities for the transmission of recycled water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81309.

“Zone” means an improvement district, assessment district, or area benefiting from a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation of Agency [81315. - 81331.]



  ARTICLE 1. Resolution of Intention [81315. - 81316.]

81315.

(a) The governing body of a public entity identified in Section 81305, by a majority vote of all of its members, may declare the intention of that entity to form the agency with all of the other public entities identified in that section.

(b) The resolution shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Identify the name of the public entity adopting the resolution.

(2) Identify the name of each public entity proposed to be a member of the agency, which shall include all public entities identified in Section 81305.

(3) Fix the time and place within the boundaries of the public entity adopting the resolution at which a hearing will be held by its governing body to determine whether to form the agency and whether to become a member of the agency. The date of the hearing may not be less than 30 days, nor more than 60 days, from the date of the adoption of the resolution.

(4) Direct publication of the resolution one time in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of the public entity adopting the resolution at least two weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81316.

The governing board of the public entity adopting the resolution pursuant to Section 81315, not later than 10 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution, shall mail a certified copy of the resolution to the governing body of each public entity identified in the resolution as a proposed member of the agency. The governing body of each proposed member, not later than 60 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution described in Section 81315, shall adopt a resolution fixing the time and place within the boundaries of that public entity at which a hearing will be held to determine whether to form the agency and whether to become a member. The date of the hearing shall be not less than 30 days, nor more than 60 days, from the date of the adoption of the resolution by that public entity. The resolution shall be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of that public entity at least two weeks prior to the date set for the public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation Hearings [81317. - 81319.]

81317.

At the times and places specified in the resolutions adopted pursuant to Section 81315 or 81316, the governing body of each public entity shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether to form, and become a member of, the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81318.

As soon as practicable after the completion of the public hearing described in Section 81317, and in any event not later than 60 days thereafter, the governing body of each public entity shall adopt a resolution that declares the finding of the governing body as to whether to form and become a member of the agency. The adoption of the resolution, whether affirmative or negative, is subject to referendum pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9000) of the Elections Code, but shall not be a “project” for the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81319.

Not later than 10 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution required by Section 81318, the governing body of each public entity shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be forwarded to the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment of Agency [81325. - 81331.]

81325.

Not later than 60 days from the date of the receipt of the resolutions pursuant to Section 81319, the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County shall determine whether or not resolutions to form and join the agency have been adopted by at least 15 public entities representing collectively at least 60 percent of the total water deliveries of all the public entities identified in Section 81305. In making that determination, the board of supervisors shall use the water delivery quantities set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 81460. If 15 or more public entities representing collectively 60 percent or more of those water deliveries have adopted those resolutions, the board of supervisors, by order entered in its minutes, shall declare that the agency has been formed and list each public entity that is a member of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81325.5.

In making the determination required by Section 81325, the board of supervisors shall include all resolutions received by the county at least 10 days before the date of the public meeting at which the determination is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81325.7.

If the board of supervisors determines that the resolutions submitted are insufficient to form the agency, the eligible public entities may again undertake the process described in Sections 81315 to 81319, inclusive, at any time. In addition, resolutions adopted that approve formation of the agency may remain in effect for the time specified in those resolutions, unless those resolutions are otherwise repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81326.

The Clerk of the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County, not later than 10 days from the date of entry of an order described in Section 81325, shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State identifying the name of the agency and the names of each public entity that is a member of the agency. The board of supervisors shall include a map showing the boundaries of the agency, with reference to the boundaries of each member public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81327.

The Secretary of State, not later than 10 days from the date of the receipt of the certificate described in Section 81326, shall issue a certificate of formation reciting that the agency has been formed pursuant to this division and identifying the public entities of which the agency is comprised. The Secretary of State shall transmit a copy of the certificate to each public entity that is a member of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81328.

The formation of the agency shall be effective on the date of the issuance of the Secretary of State’s certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81329.

No invalidity or irregularity in any proceeding that does not substantially and adversely affect the interests of any public entity identified in Section 81305 may be held to invalidate the formation of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81330.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the formation of the agency, or any of the proceedings in relation thereto, is contested, questioned, or challenged shall be commenced not later than 60 days from the date of the Secretary of State’s certificate of formation. In the absence of that action or proceeding, the formation and legal existence of the agency, and all proceedings in relation thereto, shall be held to be in every respect valid, legal, and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81331.

The formation of the agency, proceedings to increase its membership pursuant to Section 81456 or 81456.5, or the establishment or modification of any zone or improvement district is not subject to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Government of Agency [81335. - 81410.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [81335. - 81406.]

81335.

The agency shall be governed by a board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81336.

(a) The governing body of each member public entity shall appoint one member to the board of the agency. Each director shall be a registered voter and reside within the boundaries of the member public entity whose governing board appoints him or her.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), the governing body may appoint one of its own members to the board if that person otherwise meets the requirements of that subdivision.

(c) (1) The Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County shall appoint one member to the board who is an officer or employee of the California Water Service Company.

(2) The Board of Supervisors of Santa Clara County shall appoint one member to the board who is an officer or employee of Stanford University.

(d) The initial appointments shall be made not later than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the certificate of formation pursuant to Section 81327.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81336.5.

(a) No incompatibility of office shall result from an elected official serving on the board of the agency and on the governing board of a member public entity. A board member may vote on contracts or other matters involving the member public entity he or she represents.

(b) The agency may enter into a contract with California Water Service Company only if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The director appointed by the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County does not participate in a vote on the contract.

(2) The contract is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board other than the director appointed by the Board of Supervisors of San Mateo County.

(c) The agency may enter into a contract with Stanford University only if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The director appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Santa Clara County does not participate in a vote on the contract.

(2) The contract is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of all members of the board other than the director appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Santa Clara County.

(d) A contract approved pursuant to the requirements of this division does not constitute a violation of Section 1090 or 1097 of the Government Code, nor is it void or voidable pursuant to Section 1092 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81337.

Each director, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall take the oath of office as provided for in the California Constitution and laws of the state. The chairperson or vice chairperson of the board, or the secretary of the agency, may administer the oath.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81338.

(a) Each director shall serve a term of four years.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the directors initially appointed to the board shall determine, by lot, that one-half plus one of their number shall serve for four years and the remaining directors shall serve for two years. Thereafter, each appointing authority shall appoint a person to replace its respective director or may reappoint its director for an unlimited number of terms.

(c) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the respective appointing authority not later than 90 days from the date of the occurrence of the vacancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81339.

Each director may receive compensation in an amount prescribed by the board, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board, not to exceed four meetings in any calendar month. In addition, each director may be reimbursed for actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of duties performed at the request of the board. The compensation of directors may be increased pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81400.

A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81401.

The board shall hold its first meeting as soon as possible after the appointment of the initial directors. At its first meeting, and at its first meeting in January each year thereafter, the board shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson from among its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81402.

The board shall provide for the time and place of holding its regular meetings. All meetings of the board shall be called and held in accordance with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81403.

Subject to Section 81405, each director has one vote. The affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the board is necessary and sufficient to carry any motion, resolution, or ordinance, except when weighted voting is in effect pursuant to Section 81404 or as otherwise provided by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81404.

Before the vote on any motion, resolution, or ordinance is taken, any director may call for weighted voting. Upon such a call, Section 81405 shall apply as to that motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81405.

(a) Weighted voting shall be based on the average deliveries of water during the 2000–01 fiscal year, as set forth in Section 81460.

(b) When weighted voting is in effect, there shall be a total of 100 possible votes. The allocation of these votes among the directors shall be determined as follows:

(1) The water deliveries to each member public entity, California Water Service Company, and Stanford University, as set forth in Section 81460, shall be totaled.

(2) Each director representing a member public entity whose individual water delivery is less than 1.5 percent of the total amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be assigned one vote.

(3) The water deliveries to all member public entities assigned one vote pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be totaled and that sum shall be subtracted from the total amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) The ratio of individual water deliveries to each remaining member public entity, California Water Service Company, and Stanford University to the total water deliveries calculated pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be determined and expressed as a fraction.

(5) The total number of votes assigned to directors pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be subtracted from 100.

(6) The number resulting from the calculation described in paragraph (5) shall be multiplied by the fractions calculated pursuant to paragraph (4), and the products of that multiplication shall be rounded to the nearest whole number. Each director, other than those assigned one vote pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be assigned the number of votes resulting from this calculation.

(c) When weighted voting is in effect, the affirmative vote of directors representing both (1) a majority of the members of the board present and voting, and (2) a majority of the number of votes, determined pursuant to this section, represented by directors present and voting shall be necessary to carry any motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the board may establish alternative procedures and methods for weighted voting, including a limitation on the types of measures to which it applies, by a vote of (1) at least two-thirds of all the directors of the board, each director having one vote on the question, and (2) at least 51 votes, determined pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81406.

(a) On all ordinances and resolutions, and on all questions to be decided by weighted voting, the roll shall be called and ayes and noes recorded in the minutes of the proceedings of the board.

(b) Motions, other than motions to be decided by weighted voting, may be adopted by voice vote, except that the roll shall be called at the request of any director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Officers and Employees [81407. - 81410.]

81407.

The board shall appoint a general manager, a financial officer, and a secretary. The board may establish other offices that may be necessary or convenient. The board shall appoint, and prescribe the duties, compensation, and terms and conditions of employment of, all officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81408.

The board may employ other employees that the board determines are necessary or convenient and may delegate to the general manager the authority to employ or contract for the services of additional assistants or employees that the general manager determines necessary or convenient to operate the agency. The board shall extend offers of employment on terms comparable to those applicable to the employees of the Bay Area Water Users Association on January 1, 2003, as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81409.

The board may require, and establish the amount of, official bonds of officers and employees that are necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81410.

(a) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to all officers and employees of the agency.

(b) The agency is a “local government agency” for the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions of Agency [81415. - 81442.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers [81415. - 81423.]

81415.

The agency may exercise the powers that are expressly granted by this division, together with other powers that are reasonably implied from those express powers, and powers necessary and proper to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81416.

The agency may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81417.

The agency may adopt regulations to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81418.

(a) The agency may make contracts of any nature, including, but not limited to, contracts to employ labor, to indemnify and hold harmless, and to do all acts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of its powers.

(b) The agency may contract with any department or agency of the United States, the state, a public or private entity, or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81419.

The agency may take by grant, purchase, bequest, devise, lease, or eminent domain, and may hold, enjoy, lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of real and personal property of any kind, within or outside the boundaries of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81420.

The agency may plan, finance, acquire, construct, maintain, and operate facilities for the collection, transmission, treatment, reclamation, reuse, and conservation of water. The agency may carry out any project or work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81421.

The agency may disseminate information concerning its activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81422.

The agency may apply for and receive state and federal grants, loans, and other financial assistance, including, but not limited to, assistance available pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 78500), Division 26 (commencing with Section 79000), and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of this code, Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001) of the Public Resources Code, and any other financial assistance for water management activities authorized after January 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 3.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

81423.

(a) The agency may assist any of the entities identified in Section 81460 that are subject to Part 2.55 (commencing with Section 10608) of Division 6 to meet urban water use targets developed pursuant to that part. In providing this assistance, the agency may act pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10608.28. If the agency provides this assistance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10608.28, subdivision (b) of Section 10608.28 shall apply.

(b) If requested by entities listed in Section 81460 that are subject to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) of Division 6, the agency may develop and administer a regional conservation program described in clause
 (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10631.5, regardless of whether the agency is an urban water supplier. The agency shall be eligible to receive financial assistance that may be available for the development or administration of these programs.

(c) The agency shall be considered a local agency as defined in Section 10535, and a local agency with statutory authority over water supply or water management pursuant to Section 10539, with all of the authority provided to a local agency pursuant to Part 2.2 (commencing with Section 10530) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 63, Sec. 4.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Financial Matters [81425. - 81435.]

81425.

The board shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81426.

The accounts of the agency shall be audited annually in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards by independent certified public accountants with experience in auditing the accounts of local public entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81427.

The agency may borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue notes and bonds, as provided in this division or as otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81428.

(a) The agency may issue revenue bonds upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds vote of all of the members of the board present and voting which also represents at least 51 votes determined pursuant to Section 81405. For the purposes of issuing bonds pursuant to this subdivision, the agency need not conduct an election or otherwise secure the approval of the voters within the boundaries of the agency.

(b) The agency shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation at least 15 days before the meeting at which issuance of revenue bonds is to be considered and shall provide an opportunity for public comments during that meeting and before the directors vote on the issuance of those bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81429.

The agency may issue bonds for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds of the agency, whether due or not due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81430.

The agency may issue negotiable promissory notes to acquire funds for any agency purpose. The notes shall have a term not to exceed five years. The total amount of notes issued pursuant to this section that may be outstanding at any one time may not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81431.

The authority granted pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) may be exercised by the agency to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81432.

Bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the agency are legal investments for all trust funds and for funds of all insurers, commercial and savings banks, trust companies, and state schools. Funds that may be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other local agencies may also be invested in bonds and other evidences of indebtedness of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81433.

The board may impose assessments sufficient to pay the operating expenses included in the budget, which shall be an obligation of each member public entity, the California Water Service Company, and Stanford University. The assessments shall be based on, and proportional to, water delivery amounts described in Section 81460.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

81434.
